Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.120

Public stadium authority board of directors—Travel and business expenses—Resolution on payment and procedures—Operating budget report.

(1) The board of directors of the public stadium authority shall adopt a resolution that may be amended from time to time that shall establish the basic requirements governing methods and amounts of reimbursement payable to such authority and employees for travel and other business expenses incurred on behalf of the authority. The resolution shall, among other things, establish procedures for approving such expenses; the form of the travel and expense voucher; and requirements governing the use of credit cards issued in the name of the authority. The resolution may also establish procedures for payment of per diem to board members. The state auditor shall, as provided by general law, cooperate with the public stadium authority in establishing adequate procedures for regulating and auditing the reimbursement of all such expenses.

(2) The board of directors shall transmit a copy of the adopted annual operating budget of the public stadium authority to the governor and the majority leader and minority leader of the house of representatives and the senate. The budget information shall include, but is not limited to a statement of income and expenses of the public stadium authority.

[ 1997 c 220 s 111 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]